Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.560

Compilation, codification, revision of city or town ordinances—Adoption of new material.

New material shall be adopted by the city or town legislative body as separate ordinances prior to the inclusion thereof in such codification: PROVIDED, That any ordinance amending the codification shall set forth in full the section or sections, or subsection or subsections of the codification being amended, as the case may be, and this shall constitute a sufficient compliance with any statutory or charter requirement that no ordinance or any section thereof shall be revised or amended unless the new ordinance sets forth the revised ordinance or amended section in full.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.21.560. Prior: 1961 c 70 s 1; 1957 c 97 s 7.]